udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX N2 Y 615 # для неодушевленных
SFX N2 0 э [дзлнстуеӧыю]  #ед.ч.
SFX N2 0 е [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 ь е ь
SFX N2 й е й
SFX N2 0 эд [дзлнстуеӧыю] 
SFX N2 0 ед [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 ь ед ь
SFX N2 й ед й 
SFX N2 0 эз [дзлнстуеӧыю]  
SFX N2 0 ез [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 ь ез ь
SFX N2 й ез й
SFX N2 0 мы .
SFX N2 0 ты [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 ды [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 ты [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 ды [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 сы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 зы [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 сы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 зы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 ме . # 1 лицо вин.п.
SFX N2 0 мес . 
SFX N2 0 тэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ] # 2 л.
SFX N2 0 дэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 тэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 дэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 тэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 дэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 тэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 дэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ] #3л.
SFX N2 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 сэ [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь 
SFX N2 0 зэ [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 сэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 зэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 сэс [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 зэс [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь 
SFX N2 0 лэн .  # род.п.
SFX N2 0 элэн [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эдлэн [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эзлэн [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 елэн [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 едлэн [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 езлэн [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 ь елэн ь
SFX N2 й елэн й
SFX N2 ь едлэн ь
SFX N2 й едлэн й
SFX N2 ь езлэн ь
SFX N2 й езлэн й
SFX N2 0 мылэн .
SFX N2 0 тылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 дылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 тылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 дылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 сылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 зылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 сылэн [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 зылэн [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 лэсь . 	# разд.п.
SFX N2 0 лэсьсэ .
SFX N2 0 элэсь [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эдлэсь [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эзлэсь [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 елэсь [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 едлэсь [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 езлэсь [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 ь елэсь ь
SFX N2 й елэсь й
SFX N2 ь едлэсь ь
SFX N2 й едлэсь й
SFX N2 ь езлэсь ь
SFX N2 й езлэсь й
SFX N2 0 мылэсь .
SFX N2 0 тылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 дылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 тылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 дылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 сылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 зылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 сылэсь [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 зылэсь [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 лы .		 # дат.п.
SFX N2 0 элы [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эдлы [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эзлы [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 елы [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 едлы [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 езлы [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 ь елы ь
SFX N2 й елы й
SFX N2 ь едлы ь
SFX N2 й едлы й
SFX N2 ь езлы ь
SFX N2 й езлы й
SFX N2 0 мылы .
SFX N2 0 тылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 дылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 тылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 дылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 сылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 зылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 сылы [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 зылы [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 тэк . #лиш.п.
SFX N2 0 этэк [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эдтэк [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эзтэк [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 етэк [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 едтэк [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 езтэк [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 ь етэк ь
SFX N2 й етэк й
SFX N2 ь едтэк ь
SFX N2 й едтэк й
SFX N2 ь езтэк ь
SFX N2 й езтэк й
SFX N2 0 мытэк .
SFX N2 0 тытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 дытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 тытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 дытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 сытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 зытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 сытэк [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 зытэк [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 ъя [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь] #соотв.п.
SFX N2 0 я [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥь]
SFX N2 0 эя [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эдъя [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эзъя [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 ея [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 едъя [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 езъя [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 ь ея ь
SFX N2 й ея й
SFX N2 ь едъя ь
SFX N2 й едъя й
SFX N2 ь езъя ь
SFX N2 й езъя й
SFX N2 0 мыя .
SFX N2 0 тыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 дыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 тыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 дыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 сыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 зыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 сыя [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 зыя [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 эн [дзлнстуеӧыюу] #твор.п.
SFX N2 0 ен [^дзлнстуеӧыюуь]
SFX N2 ь ен ь
SFX N2 й ен й
SFX N2 0 эным [дзлнстуеӧыюу]
SFX N2 0 эныд [дзлнстуеӧыюу]
SFX N2 0 эныз [дзлнстуеӧыюу]
SFX N2 0 еным [^дзлнстуеӧыюуьй]
SFX N2 0 еныд [^дзлнстуеӧыюуьй]
SFX N2 0 еныз [^дзлнстуеӧыюуьй]
SFX N2 й еным й
SFX N2 й еныд й
SFX N2 й еныз й
SFX N2 ь еным ь
SFX N2 ь еныд ь
SFX N2 ь еныз ь
SFX N2 0 энымы [дзлнстуеӧыюу]
SFX N2 0 эныды [дзлнстуеӧыюу]
SFX N2 0 энызы [дзлнстуеӧыюу]
SFX N2 0 енымы [^дзлнстуеӧыюуьй]
SFX N2 0 еныды [^дзлнстуеӧыюуьй]
SFX N2 0 енызы [^дзлнстуеӧыюуьй]
SFX N2 й енымы й
SFX N2 й еныды й
SFX N2 й енызы й
SFX N2 ь енымы ь
SFX N2 ь еныды ь
SFX N2 ь енызы ь
SFX N2 0 ын .		#местн.п. + входн.п.
SFX N2 0 ам [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё] 
SFX N2 0 амы [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё] 
SFX N2 0 ад [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N2 0 ады [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N2 0 аз [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N2 0 азы [^ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N2 0 ям [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N2 0 ямы [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N2 0 яд [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N2 0 яды [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N2 0 яз [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N2 0 язы [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]
SFX N2 ь ям ь
SFX N2 й ям й
SFX N2 ь ямы ь
SFX N2 й ямы й
SFX N2 ь яд ь
SFX N2 й яд й
SFX N2 ь яды ь
SFX N2 й яды й
SFX N2 ь яз ь
SFX N2 й яз й
SFX N2 ь язы ь
SFX N2 й язы й
SFX N2 0 ысь . #исходн.п.
SFX N2 0 ысьтым .
SFX N2 0 ысьтымы .
SFX N2 0 ысьтыд .
SFX N2 0 ысьтыды .
SFX N2 0 ысьтыз .
SFX N2 0 ысьтызы .
SFX N2 0 ысьсэ . #-ысьсэ
SFX N2 0 ысен . #отдал.п.
SFX N2 0 ысеным .
SFX N2 0 ысенымы .
SFX N2 0 ысеныд .
SFX N2 0 ысеныды .
SFX N2 0 ысеныз .
SFX N2 0 ысенызы .
SFX N2 0 ысез . #-ысез
SFX N2 0 этӥ [дзлнстуеӧыю] #перех.п. 
SFX N2 0 этӥм [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 этӥмы [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 этӥд [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 этӥды [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 этӥз [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 этӥзы [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 етӥ [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 етӥм [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 етӥмы [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 етӥд [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 етӥды [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 етӥз [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 етӥзы [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 ь етӥ ь
SFX N2 й етӥ й
SFX N2 ь етӥм ь
SFX N2 й етӥм й
SFX N2 ь етӥмы ь
SFX N2 й етӥмы й
SFX N2 ь етӥд ь
SFX N2 й етӥд й
SFX N2 ь етӥды ь
SFX N2 й етӥды й
SFX N2 ь етӥз ь
SFX N2 й етӥз й
SFX N2 ь етӥзы ь
SFX N2 й етӥзы й
SFX N2 0 тӥ . 
SFX N2 0 тӥм .
SFX N2 0 тӥмы .
SFX N2 0 тӥд .
SFX N2 0 тӥды .
SFX N2 0 тӥз .
SFX N2 0 тӥзы .
SFX N2 0 лань . #направ.п.
SFX N2 0 элань [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эдлань [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эзлань [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 елань [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 едлань [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 езлань [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 ь елань ь
SFX N2 й елань й
SFX N2 ь едлань ь
SFX N2 й едлань й
SFX N2 ь езлань ь
SFX N2 й езлань й
SFX N2 0 мылань .
SFX N2 0 тылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 дылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 тылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 дылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 сылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]
SFX N2 0 зылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵь]
SFX N2 0 сылань [пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 зылань [^пфктсшхцчщӵ]ь
SFX N2 0 озь [^ь] #предельн.п.
SFX N2 ь ёзь [ь]
SFX N2 0 эозь [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эдозь [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 эзозь [дзлнстуеӧыю]
SFX N2 0 еозь [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 едозь [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 0 езозь [^дзлнстуеӧыюьй]
SFX N2 ь еозь ь
SFX N2 й еозь й
SFX N2 ь едозь ь
SFX N2 й едозь й
SFX N2 ь езозь ь
SFX N2 й езозь й
SFX N2 0 озям .
SFX N2 0 озяд .
SFX N2 0 озяз .
SFX N2 0 мыозь .
SFX N2 0 дыозь .
SFX N2 0 зыозь .
SFX N2 0 ъёс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # МН.ч. им.п.
SFX N2 0 ос [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёс [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёссы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 оссы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыд [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсмы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёссы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # вин.п.
SFX N2 0 ъёсты [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осты [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсыз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсты [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсме [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
