udm.dic
наплям/A1A2N2
калйыл/D1N2
автомобилист/N1N2
алгоритм/N1N2
анабазис/N1N2
антропоид/N1N2
арроба/N1N2
аутопластика/N1N2
барк/N1N2
бильдаппарат/N1N2
босс/N1N2
бьеннале/N1N2
вибрато/N1N2
галогенид/N1N2
гемограмма/N1N2
гидросульфат/N1N2
голограмма/N1N2
гуфа/N1N2
десикант/N1N2
динамизм/N1N2
дренчер/N1N2
иваси/N1N2
индикт/N1N2
ихтиорнис/N1N2
кантор/N1N2
каустик/N1N2
классификатор/N1N2
комбатант/N1N2
конфорка/N1N2
криптон/N1N2
лаглинь/N1N2
лигроин/N1N2
лямблиоз/N1N2
маркитант/N1N2
мертель/N1N2
миньон/N1N2
мотель/N1N2
нематофитон/N1N2
обсидиан/N1N2
ориенталистика/N1N2
панк/N1N2
пахиостоз/N1N2
пианола/N1N2
плетизмограф/N1N2
посейдон/N1N2
пронунсиаменто/N1N2
пьекса/N1N2
рейсмас/N1N2
роббер/N1N2
сарказм/N1N2
сигнатура/N1N2
склереида/N1N2
спидвей/N1N2
страдивариус/N1N2
табака/N1N2
термидор/N1N2
трактриса/N1N2
туальденор/N1N2
фальшкиль/N1N2
филёр/N1N2
формальдегид/N1N2
футор/N1N2
хроматофор/N1N2
чекмень/N1N2
шоппинг/N1N2
экзот/N1N2
эндокард/N1N2
эструс/N1N2
автолавка/N2
азгырмылон/N2
айвапу/N2
алдалляськон/N2
англичан/N2A1A2
арес/N2
астеносфера/N2
бабля/N2A1A2
бакатэтчась/N2
баркат/N2
бекроуробо/N2
беспризорница/N2
бичаськылон/N2
бӧрдылон/N2
бугортылон/N2
бум/N2
бут/N2
бызырмон/N2
вадьсатон/N2
вало-вало/N2
вараськылон/N2
векатон/N2
веськатылон/N2
визьсынась/N2
витиськон/N2
вожона/N2
вӧлмонни/N2
восалскон/N2
вугылтосъёс/N2
вумульы/N2
выан/N2
выльдытылон/N2
галантерея/N2
гермафродит/N2
гӧгӧрсинсяська/N2
гонӟон/N2
госстрах/N2
гудырипуз/N2
гурпу/N2
гындӥськон/N2
дасятон/N2
диван/N2
домино/N2
дунпус/N2
дымбыртылон/N2
единоличник/N2
ёрскылон/N2
жерек/N2
ӝӧккышет/N2
жуткаськон/N2
ӟазегкошкон/N2
зари/N2
зӥбытлык/N2
золтӥськон/N2
ӟузгаллян/N2
ӟыбы/N2
зюмбырскылон/N2
изьытон/N2
инсьӧрбугор/N2
исьнераллян/N2
йӧнатскон/N2
йырберган/N2
йырӵаша/N2
кал/N2
канафырсяська/N2
карачаевец/N2
катапульта/N2
кей/N2A1A2
керемет/N2A1A2
кибыли/N2
кинотеатр/N2
кисьматон/N2
кӧбератон/N2
кокыртӥськылон/N2
комеди/N2A1A2
концентрат/N2
кормос/N2
косуля/N2A1A2
котырпонэм/N2
криптозой/N2A1A2
куарагур/N2
кудӟон/N2
кузялтурын/N2
кульчояськон/N2
купыртон/N2
куртон/N2
кутычи/N2
кыдон/N2
кылбыскыяськон/N2
кылыктэмъяськон/N2
кырметтон/N2
кыӵесатон/N2
ланьыран/N2
лекатъян/N2
либатьян/N2
локас/N2
лулгажан/N2
лыдон/N2
лэзьяськылон/N2
лякылӥськон/N2
малпатон/N2
маточник/N2
мельник/N2
мид/N2
модернизм/N2
моӵ/N2
мукус/N2
мусур/N2
мылазькышет/N2
навой/N2
начармытъян/N2
нӥзь/N2A1A2
нордон/N2
нылкае/N2
ньыльпыдоос/N2
някыргож/N2
ӧвӧлтэм/N2
ӧжытатон/N2
опора/N2
оскылон/N2
падвож/N2
палэзян/N2
парсьпель/N2
паяльник/N2
пенон/N2
песянай/N2
пиналмытон/N2
пичы/N2
погран/N2
пӧзьылон/N2
понор/N2
пӧськыпужы/N2 
прилавок/N2
пряник/N2
пукылё/N2
пуньет/N2
пучыньӧр/N2
пыдчерс/N2
пырсъён/N2
радиоустановка/N2
резина/N2
рыксат/N2
салам/N2
сарпаськылон/N2
семейство/N2
сигъян/N2
синйылтылон/N2
сиськукчась/N2
соглаштэм/N2R1
стекло/N2
сукман/N2
суртгуби/N2
сьӧддурга/N2
сэно-чӧры-ӵӧж/N2
сюратай/N2
таблица/N2
таразикизили/N2
терророристка/N2
тодметпус/N2
толол/N2
транспираци/N2
туиськон/N2
туннет/N2
тыатӥськон/N2
тыриськон-ӝоктӥськон/N2
тэргаллян/N2
убир/N2A1A2
узатылон/N2
укол/N2
улытон/N2
урдэг/N2A1A2
усьтон/N2
фабула/N2
фотокарточка/N2
цикл/N2
чакотка/N2
ӵашекъяськем/N2
чернила/N2
чиетон/N2
ӵогиськылон/N2
чочоръяськылон/N2
чук/N2
чурагей/N2
ӵыжектытон/N2
шабел/N2
шапыштон/N2
шеперъяськон/N2
шӧгаллян/N2
шорӟиськон/N2
шугекъятылон/N2
шундые-толэзе/N2
шыгырскылон/N2
ыбиськон/N2
ыркан/N2
экспедитор/N2
эмужась/N2
эскулап/N2
южмон/N2
юртланон/N2
янгышан/N2
агнец/N7N2
банкомат/N7N2
браконьерство/N7N2
виртуал/N7N2
геенна/N7N2
графема/N7N2
динамо-машина/N7N2
жбан/N7N2
землячество/N7N2
казначейство/N7N2
книжечка/N7N2
краснопёрка/N7N2
логопед/N7N2
мирок/N7N2
настоятель/N7N2
объём/N7N2
папаха/N7N2
письмоносец/N7N2
полуфиналист/N7N2
приступ/N7N2
рычаг/N7N2
сокровищница/N7N2
тайнопись/N7N2
фельетонист/N7N2
щенок/N7N2
волисполком/N7N2
метасистема/N7N2
рефлексив/N7N2
фотожурналистика/N7N2
быдӟияськем/R1N2
жильдӥськем/R1N2
кормыштэм/R1N2
мертаськись/R1N2
пыриськем/R1N2
тылдӥськем/R1N2
ӵынам/R1N2
дӥнчи/N2 #
пусрад/N2 # С.М.
